Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2688.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3205(a) of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 3205. Township and Special Tax Levies.--(a) The board of supervisors may by resolution levy taxes upon all real property within the township made taxable for township purposes, as ascertained by the last adjusted valuation for county purposes, for the purposes and at the rates specified in this section. All taxes shall be collected in cash.* * *(11) An annual tax not exceeding three mills for the support of a local police department, only following a favorable referendum on the matter held in accordance with the election 1234567891011121314151617181920 laws of this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2688PN3756 - 2 - 123